Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
487A]

LANGUAGE
OF CONSUMER TRANSACTIONS

Section

487A-1 Plain language in consumer transactions

487A-2 Effect of noncompliance

487A-3 Attorney general or director of the office
of

consumer protection to enforce chapter

487A-4 Exempt transactions

Law Journals and Reviews

Timesharing in the 1990s. I HBJ No. 13, at pg. 89.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next